Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.422

Miscellaneous state funds—Warrants to be paid from basic state general fund.

From and after the first day of July, 1973, all warrants drawn on any fund abolished by RCW 43.79.421 and not theretofore presented for payment, shall be paid from the basic state general fund.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 59 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 59: See note following RCW 43.79.420.